Hawaii statutes.
§601-8 Practice of law forbidden.
Justices of the supreme court, judges of the intermediate appellate court,
judges of the circuit court, and full-time judges of the district court and of
the district family court shall not engage in the practice of law during their
terms of office. [L 1892, c 57, §3; am L 1892, c 76, §1; RL 1925, §2213; RL
1935, §3573; RL 1945, §9574; RL 1955, §213-4; HRS §601-8; am L 1970, c 188, §7;
am L 1979, c 111, §23]

Rules of Court

See JC rule 3.10.

Case Notes

Cited: 27 H. 509, 526 (1923).

Discussed: 74 H. 394, 846 P.2d 894 (1993).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next